Connecticut, session 2026, HB05317.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 49-7b of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
2 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
3 1, 2026):
4 (a) For purposes of this section, "mortgage loan" means a loan that is
5 (1) secured by a first mortgage on one-to-four-family residential real
6 property located in this state, and (2) made for the purpose of financing
7 the purchase of such property.
8 [(a)] (b) Not later than ten days prior to the date of the closing in a
9 mortgage loan transaction, each creditor, as defined in section 49-6a,
10 shall notify the mortgage loan applicant, in writing, that: (1) Standard
11 homeowners insurance policies do not cover flood damage and related
12 losses; (2) flood damage to property may occur regardless of whether
HB5317 / File No. 111 1

HB5317 File No. 111
13 the real property is located in a designated flood zone; and (3) the
14 applicant may wish to consult a licensed insurance producer or surplus
15 lines broker concerning the availability and benefits of obtaining flood
16 insurance.
17 [(b)] (c) The notice required by subsection [(a)] (b) of this section shall
18 be written in plain language and signed and dated by the mortgage loan
19 applicant to acknowledge receipt of such notice. Each creditor shall keep
20 and maintain a copy of such notice with the mortgage loan applicant's
21 mortgage records.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 49-7b
BA Joint Favorable
HB5317 / File No. 111 2

HB5317 File No. 111
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill limits flood notice requirements to mortgage loan applicants
for only certain types of mortgages. This has no fiscal impact to the state
or municipalities as they are not parties to mortgage loans.
HB5317 / File No. 111 3

HB5317 File No. 111
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5317
AN ACT DEFINING "MORTGAGE LOAN" FOR PURPOSES OF
CERTAIN NOTICE PROVISIONS RELATING TO FLOOD DAMAGE
AND INSURANCE.